Massachusetts, session 194th, H3407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 65. The song, “Massachusetts”, words and music by Montenia, shall be the
official jazz song of the commonwealth.
of 1